src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k50_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skjøldur
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: [skjøldur, skjøld]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: [skjøldri, skildri, skildi]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: [skjaldrar, skjaldar]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: [skjøldrar, skjøldir, skildir]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: [skjøldrar, skjøldir, skildir]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: [skjøldrum, skjøldum]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: [skjaldra, skjaldar]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: skjøldurin
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: [skjøldurin, skjøldin]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [skjøldrinum, skildrinum, skildinum]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: [skjaldrarinnar, skjaldarinnar]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: [skjøldrarnir, skjøldirnir, skildirnir]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: [skjøldrarnar, skjøldirnar, skildirnar]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: [skjøldrunum, skjøldunum]
    skjøldur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: [skjaldranna, skjaldaranna]
